src/fst/stems/pron.lexc
LEXICON PRON_KOKO

:	# ;


LEXICON PRON_KUKA

+Pl+Abe:eittä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Abl:eiltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Ade:eillä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+All:eille	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Ela:eistä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Ess:einä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Gen:eiden	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Use/NG+Pl+Gen:eitten	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Ill:eihin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Ine:eissä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Ins:ein	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:etkä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_S ;

+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg:utka	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT_S ;

+Pl+Par:eitä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Pl+Tra:eiksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Abe:enettä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Abl:eltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Abl:eneltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Acc:enet	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ade:ellä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ade:enellä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+All:elle	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+All:enelle	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ela:enestä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ela:estä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ess:enenä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ess:enä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Gen:enen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ill:ehen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ill:eneen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ine:enessä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ine:essä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Nom:uka	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT_S ;

+Sg+Par:etä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Tra:eneksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Com:ine	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_KUKAAN

+Pl+Abl:eiltään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:eilläkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:eillään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:eillekään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All+Dial/Finland:eilleen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:einäkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:einään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:eidenkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Use/NG+Pl+Gen:eittenkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:eihinkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:etkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg:utkaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:eitäkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:eitään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:eltäkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:eltään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:eneltäkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:elläkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:ellään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:enelläkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:ellekään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:enellekään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All+Dial/Finland:elleen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:enäkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:enään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:enenkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:ehenkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:eneenkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:etäkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:etään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:eneksikään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:ukaan	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_KUKAKIN

+Pl+Abe:eittäkin	# ;

+Pl+Abl:eiltäkin	# ;

+Pl+Ade:eilläkin	# ;

+Pl+All:eillekin	# ;

+Pl+Ela:eistäkin	# ;

+Pl+Ess:einäkin	# ;

+Pl+Gen:eidenkin	# ;

+Use/NG+Pl+Gen:eittenkin	# ;

+Pl+Ill:eihinkin	# ;

+Pl+Ine:eissäkin	# ;

+Pl+Nom:etkäkin	# ;

+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg:utkakin	# ;

+Pl+Par:eitäkin	# ;

+Pl+Tra:eiksikin	# ;

+Sg+Abe:enettäkin	# ;

+Sg+Abl:eltäkin	# ;

+Sg+Abl:eneltäkin	# ;

+Sg+Acc:enetkin	# ;

+Sg+Ade:elläkin	# ;

+Sg+Ade:enelläkin	# ;

+Sg+All:ellekin	# ;

+Sg+All:enellekin	# ;

+Sg+Ela:enestäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ela:estäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ess:enenäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ess:enäkin	# ;

+Sg+Gen:enenkin	# ;

+Sg+Ill:ehenkin	# ;

+Sg+Ill:eneenkin	# ;

+Sg+Ine:enessäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ine:essäkin	# ;

+Sg+Nom:ukakin	# ;

+Sg+Par:etäkin	# ;

+Sg+Tra:eneksikin	# ;


LEXICON PRON_KUKIN

+Pl+Abl:uiltakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:uillakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:uillekin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:uistakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:uinakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:uidenkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:uihinkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:uissakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:uitakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:uiksikin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:ultakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:ullakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:ullekin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:ustakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:unakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:unkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:uhunkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:ussakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:utakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:uksikin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:ukin	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_KUMPI

+Sg:ma	PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:ma	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:m	PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;

+Sg:pa	PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:pa	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:pa	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:pa	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;

:pi	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:p	PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;

:p	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:p	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:p	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;


LEXICON PRON_KUMPIKAAN

+Pl+Abl:miltakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:millakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:millekaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:mistakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:pinakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:pienkaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:piinkaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:missakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:matkaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:piakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:miksikaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:maltakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:mallakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:mallekaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:mastakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:panakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:mankaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:paankaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:massakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:paakaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:maksikaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:pikaan	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_KUMPIKIN

+Pl+Abl:miltakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:millakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:millekin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:mistakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:pinakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:pienkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:piinkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:missakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:matkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:piakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:miksikin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:maltakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:mallakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:mallekin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:mastakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:panakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:mankin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:paankin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:massakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:paakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:maksikin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:pikin	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_MA

:	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_ME

+Acc:idät	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Gen:idän	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Gen+Dial/Finland:ijän	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Gen+Dial/Finland:iän	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Gen+Dial/Finland:än	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:	PRON_FRONT_PLNOM_0 ;
+Nom:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS ;
! PRON_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS
+Ess:%>i%>nä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Com:%>i%>ne	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
! PRON_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS
+Abe:%>i%>ttä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Abl:%>i%>ltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ade:%>i%>llä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+All:%>i%>lle	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ela:%>i%>stä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ine:%>i%>ssä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ins:%>i%>n	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
+Par:%>i%>tä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
+Ill:%>i%>hin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_MIE

:e	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg+Acc:ut	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:nnuu	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg:u	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:u	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

+Sg:u	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:u	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN ;


LEXICON PRON_MIKIN

+Pl+Nom:tkin	# ;

+Sg+Nom:kin	# ;

+Sg+Abl:ltäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ade:lläkin	# ;

+Sg+All:llekin	# ;

+Sg+Ela:stäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ess:näkin	# ;

+Sg+Gen:nkin	# ;

+Sg+Ill:hinkin	# ;

+Sg+Ill:nnekin	# ;

+Sg+Ine:ssäkin	# ;

+Sg+Par:täkin	# ;

+Sg+Tra:ksikin	# ;

LEXICON PRONOUN
me+Pron+Pers+Pl1:me      PRON_ME ;
te+Pron+Pers+Pl2:te      PRON_ME ;
he+Pron+Pers+Pl3:he      PRON_ME ;
ei-kukaan+Pron:ei-k  PRON_KUKAAN  ;
eri+Pron:eri  PRON_KOKO  ;
itse% kukin+Pron:itse% k  PRON_KUKIN  ;
joka+Pron:joka  PRON_KOKO  ;
jompi+Pron:jom  PRON_KUMPI  ;
kuka+Pron:k  PRON_KUKA  ;
kuka+Pron:k  PRON_KUKA  ;
kuka+Pron:k  PRON_KUKA  ;
kukaan+Pron:k  PRON_KUKAAN  ;
kukakin+Pron:k  PRON_KUKAKIN  ;
kukin+Pron:k  PRON_KUKIN  ;
kumpainenkin+Pron:kumpainenkin  PRON_KOKO  ;
kumpi+Pron:kum  PRON_KUMPI  ;
kumpi+Pron:kum  PRON_KUMPI  ;
kumpikaan+Pron:kum  PRON_KUMPIKAAN  ;
kumpikin+Pron:kum  PRON_KUMPIKIN  ;
ma+Pron:ma  PRON_MA  ;
mi+Pron:mi  PRON_KOKO  ;
mie+Pron:mi  PRON_MIE  ;
mikin+Pron:mi  PRON_MIKIN  ;
sa+Pron:sa  PRON_MA  ;
sie+Pron:si  PRON_MIE  ;
yksikään+Pron:yksikään  PRON_KOKO  ;
